Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.225.215

Enrollment of children without legal residences.

(1) A school district shall not require proof of residency or any other information regarding an address for any child who is eligible by reason of age for the services of the school district if the child does not have a legal residence.

(2) A school district shall enroll a child without a legal residence under subsection (1) of this section at the request of the child or parent or guardian of the child.

[ 1989 c 118 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.58.235.]